Utah statutes.
62A-15-625.   Voluntary admission of adults.
(1)  A local mental health authority or its designee may admit to that
authority, for observation, diagnosis, care, and treatment any individual who
is mentally ill or has symptoms of mental illness and who, being 18 years of
age or older, applies for voluntary admission.
(2) (a)  No adult may be committed or continue to be committed to a local
mental health authority against his will except as provided in this chapter.
(b) A person under 18 years of age may be committed to the physical custody of
a local mental health authority only after a court commitment proceeding in
accordance with the provisions of Part 7, Commitment of Persons Under Age 18
to Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health.
(3)  An adult may be voluntarily admitted to a local mental health authority
for treatment at the Utah State Hospital as a condition of probation or stay
of sentence only after the requirements of Subsection 77-18-1(13) have been
met.
